Hawaii statutes.
[§659-9] Corporations not liable to writ,
when. Where the legislature has granted to a corporation the right to
determine the validity of the elections of its members or officers, a writ
shall not be issued for the purpose of inquiring into that fact. [L 1876, c 39,
§44; RL 1925, §2724; RL 1935, §4266; RL 1945, §10287; RL 1955, §236-27; HRS
§659-54; ren HRS §659-9]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next